Utah statutes.
10-2-102.   Incorporation of a contiguous area -- Governing provisions of city or town incorporation.

(1)  A contiguous area of a county not within a municipality may incorporate as a municipality as provided in this part.

(2) (a)  Incorporation as a city is governed by Sections 10-2-103 through 10-2-124.

(b)  Incorporation as a town is governed by Sections 10-2-125 through 10-2-129.



Amended by Chapter 359, 2012 General Session

